Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 1

General Provisions

11-24-101. “Municipality” construed to include counties.

For the purposes of this part, “municipality” shall be construed to mean any city, town, township, school district, or other political subdivision including counties of the state of Tennessee.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 1; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-901.

Cross-References. Cooperation for park purposes, § 11-3-104.

Parks and recreation services for small cities and towns, § 11-21-111.

Law Reviews.

Consolidation of County and City Functions and Other Devices for Simplifying Tennessee Local Government (Wallace Mendelson), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 878.

11-24-102. Dedication and acquisition of property for recreational purposes.

The governing body of any city or town, or county, or any school district, may dedicate and set apart for use as playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational purposes, any lands or buildings, or both, owned or leased by such municipality and not dedicated or devoted to another and inconsistent public use, and such municipality may, in such manner as may now or hereafter be authorized or provided by law for the acquisition of lands or buildings for public purposes, acquire or lease lands or buildings, or both, for such recreational purposes, or if there is no law authorizing such acquisition or leasing of such lands or buildings, the governing body of any such municipality is hereby empowered to acquire lands or buildings, or both, for such purposes by gift, purchase, condemnation or lease.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-902.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Parks and Public Squares, § 1.

11-24-103. Operation and maintenance of parks, and recreational facilities and programs.

A municipality has the power to operate and maintain parks and recreation facilities and to conduct recreation programs. This power includes the power to appropriate funds for these purposes.

A municipality shall use one (1) and only one (1) of the following methods to operate and maintain parks and recreation facilities and to conduct recreation programs:

The authority to operate and maintain parks and recreation facilities and to conduct recreation programs may be retained by the governing body of a municipality and in that case there may be a recreation advisory board or boards. If an advisory board or boards are created, they shall be so named and shall be created by ordinance. The affairs of advisory boards shall be conducted in a manner determined by the governing body of the municipality. Advisory boards shall not be responsible for the supervision of staff, the hiring or dismissal of staff, the expenditure of public funds or the promulgation or enforcement of rules and regulations governing parks and recreation facilities or programs. However, advisory boards may advise the governing body of the municipality on any of these matters and act on behalf of the governing body, on a case by case basis, if so authorized by the governing body;

The authority to operate and maintain parks and recreation facilities and to conduct recreation programs may be delegated by the governing body of a municipality to a parks and recreation board as permitted by § 11-24-104(a); and

The authority to operate and maintain parks and recreation facilities and to conduct recreation programs may be delegated by the governing body of a municipality to a joint board or authority as permitted by § 11-24-105.

A municipality may employ a parks and recreation director and any other supervisory or maintenance staff as it deems proper. The director shall be qualified by education and experience and be of good moral character.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted as abolishing or limiting the powers or authority of local parks and recreation boards or special boards of trustees with responsibility for park properties pursuant to existing state law.

Notwithstanding chapter 21 of this title, or any other law to the contrary, if by resolution or ordinance a county legislative body selects one of the methods enumerated in subsection (b) to manage county parks and recreation facilities and programs, then chapter 21 shall not apply within the county until such resolution or ordinance is superseded or repealed.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 3; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-903; Acts 1985, ch. 133, § 1; 2000, ch. 857, § 1.

11-24-104. Creation of board — Delegation of authority — Members — Term — Vacancies.

If the governing body of any municipality determines that the power to provide, establish, conduct and maintain a supervised recreation system and facilities as aforementioned, and to acquire by gift, purchase, condemnation or lease, lands and buildings for such purposes, shall be exercised by a recreation board or commission or the school board, or park board, such governing body shall, by resolution or ordinance, vest such powers in such body, and the body to which such powers and duties shall be thus delegated shall have the same powers which the governing body would have had to effectually carry out the purpose of this part; provided, that if there is not a recreation board or commission in existence and it is the desire of the governing body to vest the powers, duties and responsibilities in a recreation board or commission, then the governing body shall have the power to create such board or commission which shall consist of five (5) persons, at least two (2) of whom may be members of the school staff, to be appointed by the presiding officer of such governing body, to serve for terms of five (5) years or until their successors are appointed, except that the members of such board or commission first appointed shall be appointed for such terms that the term of one (1) member shall expire annually thereafter. The members of such board or commission shall serve without pay. Vacancies in such board or commission occurring otherwise than by expiration of term shall be filled only for the unexpired term, and such appointment shall be filled by the presiding officer of the governing body.

Any county having a population of not less than fifty-seven thousand four hundred (57,400) nor more than fifty-seven thousand five hundred (57,500), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall have the authority to create a recreation board or commission in accordance with this part, which shall be composed of nine (9) members. Eight (8) of the members shall be members of the community, with each civil district of the county being represented. The ninth member shall be a county commissioner appointed by the chairman of the commission and confirmed by the county commission as a whole. All members of the board shall be voting members. Board members shall serve terms of four (4) years; provided, however, that the initial terms shall expire at staggered intervals so that two (2) members' terms expire each year during the first four (4) years, with the terms of the longest serving parks and recreation board members expiring first. Vacancies on the board shall be filled by the county commission in consultation with the nominating authority appointed by the commission. Board members shall be compensated at a rate of fifty dollars ($50.00) per meeting, with a maximum of twelve (12) paid meetings occurring each year.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-904; Acts 2014, ch. 658, § 1; 2020, ch. 723, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “twelve (12)” for “eight (8)” in the last sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 723, § 2. June 22, 2020.

11-24-105. Joint systems.

Any two (2) or more municipalities may jointly provide, establish, maintain and conduct a supervised recreation system and acquire property for and establish and maintain playgrounds, recreation centers, and other recreational facilities and activities.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-905.

11-24-106. Gifts of property for recreational purposes — Expenditure of funds.

A recreation board or commission or other authority in which this part vests the power to provide, establish, maintain and conduct such supervised recreation system may accept any grant or devise of real estate or any gift or bequest of money or other personal property or any donation to be applied, principal or income, for either temporary or permanent use for playgrounds or recreation purposes, but if the acceptance thereof for such purpose will subject the municipality to additional expense for improvement, maintenance or renewal, the acceptance of any grant or devise of real estate shall be subject to the approval of the governing body of such municipality. Money received for such purpose, unless otherwise provided by the terms of the gift or bequest, shall be deposited with the treasurer of the municipality to the account of the recreation board or other body having charge of such work, and the same may be withdrawn and paid out in the same manner as money appropriated for recreational purposes.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-906.

Cross-References. Expenditures authorized, §§ 11-3-106, 11-4-404.

11-24-107. Bonds — Issuance authorized for recreational purposes.

The governing body of any municipality may, pursuant to law, provide that the bonds of such municipality may be issued in the manner provided by law for the issuance of bonds for other purposes, for the purpose of acquiring lands or buildings for playgrounds, recreation centers and other recreational purposes, and for the equipment for such items.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-907.

11-24-108. Maintenance and conduct — Funding and taxation.

It is the duty of the governing body of a municipality or county to provide for maintenance and conduct of any recreation system created under this part.

The funds for such maintenance and conduct may be provided from any of the following sources:

By taxes levied upon real and personal property of the municipality or county;

From the general revenue of the municipality or county from whatever source;

From reasonable fees and charges for program services and for use of facilities; and

From any otherwise lawful funding source considered by the governing body to be appropriate for these purposes.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-908; Acts 1992, ch. 696, § 1.

11-24-109. Special playground and recreation tax.

The governing body of any municipality or county adopting this part may levy and collect a tax, the rate of which to be set by the governing body and the proceeds to be designated as a special playground and recreation tax, and shall be levied and collected in like manner as a general tax of the municipality, but the same shall be in addition to and exclusive of all other taxes such municipality may levy or collect, nor shall such tax be sealed down under any existing law.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-909; Acts 1992, ch. 696, § 2.

11-24-110. Use of school district buildings, grounds or equipment by municipal recreation system.

Any county board of education or the governing body of any special school district may grant the use of any buildings, grounds, or equipment of the district to any municipal recreation system for the purpose of carrying out this part whenever such use of the school buildings, grounds or equipment for such purposes will not interfere with the use of the buildings, grounds and equipment for any purposes of the public school system.

The departments of environment and conservation and education shall assist municipal recreation systems with a positive program of technical advice so as to assure that school officials and municipal recreation systems cooperate in making school facilities available for recreational purposes. In providing this service, such departments shall work cooperatively with the Tennessee School Boards Association and the Tennessee Recreation and Parks Association. All state and local officials working in furtherance of this section shall take due notice of the model Tennessee agreement between school boards and parks and recreation agencies as jointly published by the Tennessee School Boards Association and the Tennessee Parks and Recreation Association and as this document may from time to time, be amended. A current copy of this document with amendments shall be kept on file in the office of the parks and recreation technical advisory service.

Acts 1937, ch. 307, § 10; C. Supp. 1950, § 3516.10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 11-910; Acts 1989, ch. 23, § 1.

11-24-111. Proceeds from amusement facilities — Restoration of historic structures.

Any municipality, county or metropolitan government which rents, leases, or otherwise makes available to any private entity or person, space within a public park for the operation of a sports or amusement facility operated for profit, shall be entitled to devote a portion of the proceeds it receives from the operation of such facility for the repair and restoration of any historic structure, including fortifications from the Civil War period, which is located in the same park.

This section shall not apply to counties having a population of not less than three hundred fifteen thousand (315,000) nor more than three hundred fifty thousand (350,000) according to the federal census of 1980 or any subsequent census.

Acts 1983, ch. 30, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

11-24-112. Rules and regulations.

Parks and recreation boards created under § 11-24-104(a) or joint systems created under § 11-24-105 are empowered to make, alter, amend or repeal rules and regulations for the protection, regulation and control of parks, preserves, parkways, playgrounds, recreation centers, and other property under their control. No rules and regulations adopted shall be contrary to, or inconsistent with, the laws of the state of Tennessee or the ordinances of the municipality within which a facility is located. Such rules and regulations shall be enforced by local law enforcement officials.

Rules and regulations shall not take effect until ten (10) days after their adoption by the board, after their publication once a week for two (2) weeks in at least one (1) paper circulating in the county and after a copy thereof has been posted near each gate or principal entrance to the public ground to which they apply. All rules, after being so adopted and after notice is given, shall be subject to enforcement by a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each violation to be levied against any person found guilty of violating such rules and regulations.

Copies of rules and regulations subject to such enforcement must be available for public inspection or review at the principal office of the parks and recreation board or joint system. Any county adopting this section is authorized to make such additional rules and regulations for the reasonable implementation of this section, and these rules and regulations shall be enforceable by the sheriff of the county.

This section shall not apply to counties having a metropolitan form of government.

Acts 1984, ch. 902, §§ 1, 2.

11-24-113. Individual honored by park, recreation or other property dedication need not be deceased.

No municipality, recreation board or commission or other authority in which this part vests the power to provide, establish, maintain and conduct a supervised recreation system shall require that any parks, recreation facilities and other property under its control be named in dedication only to individuals who are deceased at the time of such naming.

Acts 2009, ch. 500, § 3.